Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-215
Constitutional convention; candidates; petition; contents.

The petition shall contain a provision to the effect that each signer thereof recommends the candidate or candidates for the nomination contained therein. The names of more than two candidates shall not be set forth in any one petition. Signers shall conform to sections 32-629 and 32-630. No elector shall sign his or her name to the petition or petitions for the nomination of more than two candidates. If an elector has signed his or her name for the nomination of more than two candidates, his or her name shall not be counted for any of such candidates.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 4, p. 549;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 563.